District of Columbia statutes.
26-313

Limitation of license.

Not more than one location of business or mobile unit shall be maintained under the same license. More than one license may be issued to the same licensee upon compliance with this chapter for each new license.

May 12, 1998, D.C. Law 12-111, § 14, 45 DCR 1782
1981 Ed., § 26-1113.